Tennessee, session 114, HB1684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-101, is amended by deleting
subdivision (53)(B) and substituting instead:
(B) Is operated primarily on sidewalks, crosswalks, bicycle lanes or paths,
shoulders, the area adjacent to the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway, parking lots,
or a similar area;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-209(b), is amended by deleting
the period (.) at the end of the subsection and substituting instead the language "and in other
areas, up to twenty (20) miles per hour."
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-209(e), is amended by deleting
the first sentence, which presently reads:
Personal delivery devices may be prohibited by local resolutions or ordinances if
the local government determines that the prohibition is necessary, in the interest of
public safety.
and substituting instead:
Personal delivery devices may be regulated by local resolutions or ordinances if
the local government determines that the regulation is necessary, in the interest of public
safety. A regulation adopted by a local government must not be inconsistent with this
section.
HB1684
010772
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-209, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subsection (a) and redesignating existing subsection (a) and the
remaining subsections accordingly:
(a) Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, a person or entity may operate a
personal delivery device on a sidewalk, crosswalk, bicycle lane or path, shoulder, the
area adjacent to the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway, parking lot, or a similar area
in this state. A personal delivery device has all of the rights and is subject to all of the
duties under this chapter and chapter 10, parts 1-5 of this title that are applicable to a
pedestrian when operated in a pedestrian area or a bicyclist when operated in all other
areas, except as to those provisions that by their nature can have no application or that
would place an unreasonable burden on the operation of the personal delivery device.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010772